North Dakota statutes. TITLE 54 State Government
CHAPTER 54-52.5 State Retirement and Investment Office

54-52.5-01.
North Dakota state retirement and investment office.

The state retirement and investment office is created to coordinate the activities of the state investment board and teachers’ fund for retirement.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 667, § 1; 1991, ch. 628, § 1.

54-52.5-02.
Governing authority.

The state investment board shall govern the state retirement and investment office. The state investment board is responsible for overseeing and operating the agency and may do all things necessary to coordinate the activities of the state investment board and the teachers’ fund for retirement. The board of trustees of the teachers’ fund for retirement and the state investment board shall maintain their legal identities and authority as otherwise provided by law.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 667, § 1; 1991, ch. 628, § 1.

54-52.5-03.
State retirement and investment fund — Cost of operation of agency.

A special fund known as the “state retirement and investment fund” is established for the purpose of defraying administrative expenses of the state retirement and investment office. The actual amount of administrative expenses incurred by the state retirement and investment office must be paid from the respective funds listed under section 21-10-06 and are hereby appropriated to the state retirement and investment fund in proportion to the services rendered for each fund as estimated by the state investment board. The amount necessary to pay all administrative expenses of the state retirement and investment office must be paid from the state retirement and investment fund in accordance with the agency’s appropriation authority. Any interest income earned on the state retirement and investment fund must be credited to the fund.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 667, § 1; 1991, ch. 628, § 1.